Maryland, session 2026, HB0059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
14–132.
(a) In this section, “wrongful detainer” means to hold possession of real property
without the right of possession.
(b) This section does not apply if:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0059*

HOUSE BILL 59
(1) The person in actual possession of the property has been granted
possession under a court order;
(2) A remedy is available under Title 8 of this article; or
(3) Any other exclusive means to recover possession is provided by statute
or rule.
(c) A person may not hold possession of property unless the person is entitled to
possession of the property under the law.
(d) (1) If a person violates subsection (c) of this section, a person claiming
possession may make complaint in writing to the District Court of the county in which the
property is located.
(2) (i) On receipt of a complaint under paragraph (1) of this subsection,
the court shall summons immediately the person in possession to appear before the court
on the day specified in the summons to show cause, if any, why restitution of the possession
of the property to the person filing the complaint should not be made.
(ii) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (J) OF THIS
SECTION, A hearing scheduled under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall be held not
more than 10 business days after the complaint is filed under paragraph (1) of this
subsection.
(3) If, for any reason, the person in actual possession cannot be found after
two good faith efforts on different days, the person authorized to serve process by the
Maryland Rules shall:
(i) File an affidavit with the court describing the good faith efforts
to serve the person in actual possession;
(ii) Mail a copy of the complaint by certified mail, return receipt
requested, and first–class mail to the last known address of the person in actual possession
and, if different, to the address of the residential property subject to the complaint; and
(iii) Affix an attested copy of the summons conspicuously on the
property.
(4) If notice of the summons is sent to the person in possession in
accordance with paragraph (3) of this subsection, the notice shall constitute sufficient
service to support restitution of possession.
(5) Service shall be made under paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection
within 4 business days after the complaint is filed under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(e) A counterclaim or cross–claim may not be filed in an action brought under this

HOUSE BILL 59 3
section.
(f) (1) If the court determines that the complainant is legally entitled to
possession, the court shall:
(i) Give judgment for restitution of the possession of the property to
the complainant; and
(ii) Issue its warrant to the sheriff or constable commanding the
sheriff or constable to deliver possession to the complainant.
(2) The court may also give judgment in favor of the complainant for
damages due to the wrongful detainer and for court costs and attorney fees if:
(i) The complainant claimed damages in the complaint; and
(ii) The court finds that:
1. The person in actual possession was personally served
with the summons; or
2. There was service of process or submission to the
jurisdiction of the court as would support a judgment in contract or tort.
(3) A person in actual possession who is not personally served with a
summons is not subject to the personal jurisdiction of the District Court if the person
appears in response to the summons and prior to the time that evidence is taken by the
court and asserts that the appearance is only for the purpose of defending an in rem action.
(g) Subject to § 8–118.1 of this article, a party to a wrongful detainer action
brought in the District Court under this section may demand a trial by jury in accordance
with Title 8, Subtitle 6 of this article.
(h) (1) Not later than 10 days from the entry of the judgment of the District
Court, either party may appeal to the circuit court for the county in which the property is
located.
(2) The person in actual possession of the property may retain possession
until the determination of the appeal if the person:
(i) Files with the court an affidavit that the appeal is not taken for
delay; and
(ii) 1. Files sufficient bond with one or more securities
conditioned on diligent prosecution of the appeal; or
2. Pays to the complainant or into the appellate court:

HOUSE BILL 59
A. The fair rental value of the property for the entire period
of possession up to the date of judgment;
B. All court costs in the case;
C. All losses or damages other than the fair rental value of
the property up to the day of judgment that the court determined to be due because of the
detention of possession; and
D. The fair rental value of the property during the pendency
of the appeal.
(3) On application of either party, the court shall set a hearing date for the
appeal that is not less than 5 days or more than 15 days after the application for appeal.
(4) Notice of the order for a hearing shall be served on the parties or the
parties’ counsels not less than 5 days before the hearing.
(i) If the judgment of the circuit court shall be in favor of the person claiming
possession, a warrant shall be issued by the court to the sheriff, who shall proceed
immediately to execute the warrant.
(J) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SECTION, IF THE
PROPERTY THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF A COMPLAINT UNDER THIS SECTION IS, AT THE
TIME OF THE COMPLAINT, ADVERTISED FOR SALE OR LEASE OR LISTED FOR SALE
OR LEASE ON A LOCAL MULTIPLE LISTING SERVICE, WRONGFUL DETAINER
PROCEEDINGS UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE EXPEDITED AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (I) THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL SUMMONS IMMEDIATELY, IN
PERSON, THE PERSON IN ACTUAL POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY TO APPEAR
BEFORE THE COURT ON THE DAY SPECIFIED IN THE SUMMONS, WHICH MAY NOT BE
MORE THAN 5 DAYS AFTER THE FILING OF THE COMPLAINT; AND
(II) IF, FOR ANY REASON, THE PERSON CANNOT BE FOUND, THE
PERSON AUTHORIZED TO SERVE PROCESS BY THE MARYLAND RULES SHALL AFFIX
AN ATTESTED COPY OF THE SUMMONS CONSPICUOUSLY ON THE PROPERTY;
(2) THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL ISSUE A RULING ON THE
COMPLAINT WITHIN 2 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE HEARING;
(3) (I) AN APPEAL AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL BE FILED WITH THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH
THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED BY EITHER PARTY WITHIN 2 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE
ENTRY OF THE JUDGMENT OF THE DISTRICT COURT;

HOUSE BILL 59 5
(II) 1. THE CIRCUIT COURT SHALL SET A HEARING DATE FOR
AN APPEAL WITHIN 3 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE APPLICATION FOR APPEAL; AND
2. THE CIRCUIT COURT SHALL SERVE NOTICE OF THE
ORDER FOR THE HEARING ON THE PARTIES OR THE PARTIES’ COUNSELS
IMMEDIATELY AND IN PERSON; AND
(III) THE JUDGMENT OF THE CIRCUIT COURT SHALL BE ISSUED
WITHIN 2 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE APPEAL HAS BEEN HEARD; AND
(4) IF THE DISTRICT COURT, OR THE CIRCUIT COURT IN THE EVENT
OF AN APPEAL, RULES IN FAVOR OF THE COMPLAINANT:
(I) A WARRANT SHALL BE ISSUED BY THE COURT TO THE
SHERIFF WITHIN 24 HOURS AFTER THE RULING; AND
(II) THE SHERIFF SHALL PROCEED IMMEDIATELY TO EXECUTE
THE WARRANT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.